Maryland, session 2026, HB1544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
10–207.
(a) To qualify for admission to the Bar, an applicant shall be an individual who
meets the requirements of this section.
(b) An applicant shall be of good character and reputation.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1544*

HOUSE BILL 1544
(c) An applicant shall be at least 18 years old as of the date of admission.
(d) An applicant shall:
(1) have completed the academic work necessary to meet the minimum
requirements for admission to an American Bar Association approved law school; and
(2) have a degree of juris doctor or its equivalent from a law school that the
Board recognizes.
(e) An applicant shall [pass]:
(1) PASS a written examination given by the Board under this subtitle; OR
(2) SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE THE MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
ESTABLISHED BY THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND FOR AN ALTERNATIVE
PATHWAY TO LICENSURE.
(f) An applicant shall meet any other qualification or requirement that the
Supreme Court of Maryland establishes by rule.
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 4. MARYLAND JUSTICE CORPS PROGRAM.
12–401.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PARTICIPANT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE APPLICATION TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM HAS BEEN APPROVED.
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND JUSTICE CORPS PROGRAM.
(D) “SUPERVISING ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ORGANIZATION THAT
PROVIDES CLOSE SUPERVISION OF AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT TO A
PARTICIPANT.
12–402.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND JUSTICE CORPS PROGRAM IN THE UNIVERSITY
SYSTEM OF MARYLAND.

HOUSE BILL 1544 3
(B) (1) THE PROGRAM SHALL BE ADMINISTERED JOINTLY BY THE
UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND FRANCIS KING CAREY SCHOOL OF LAW AND THE
UNIVERSITY OF BALTIMORE SCHOOL OF LAW.
(2) IN ADMINISTERING THE PROGRAM, THE UNIVERSITY OF
MARYLAND FRANCIS KING CAREY SCHOOL OF LAW AND THE UNIVERSITY OF
BALTIMORE SCHOOL OF LAW SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH APPLICATION PROCEDURES FOR THE
PROGRAM;
(II) REVIEW APPLICATIONS AND SELECT INDIVIDUALS TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM WHO MEET THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(III) VERIFY THAT EACH PARTICIPANT IS PLACED WITH A
SUITABLE SUPERVISING ORGANIZATION;
(IV) SUPPORT PARTICIPANTS AND SUPERVISING
ORGANIZATIONS; AND
(V) MONITOR THE COMPLIANCE OF PARTICIPANTS AND
SUPERVISING ORGANIZATIONS WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE PROGRAM AND
THE LAWS OF THE STATE.
12–403.
(A) APPLICATIONS FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM MAY BE
ACCEPTED BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE APPROVED FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE
PROGRAM IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(1) SUBMITS AN APPLICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED FOR THE PROGRAM;
(2) IS A GRADUATE OF THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND FRANCIS
KING CAREY SCHOOL OF LAW OR THE UNIVERSITY OF BALTIMORE SCHOOL OF
LAW;
(3) HAS NOT TAKEN THE MARYLAND BAR EXAMINATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1544
(4) HAS COMMITTED TO A 3–YEAR TERM OF PARTICIPATION IN THE
PROGRAM WITH A SUPERVISING ORGANIZATION THAT THE PROGRAM HAS
DETERMINED TO BE SUITABLE.
(C) TO BE DETERMINED AS A SUITABLE SUPERVISING ORGANIZATION
UNDER THE PROGRAM, THE SUPERVISING ORGANIZATION SHALL:
(1) BE A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ORGANIZATION LOCATED IN THE STATE;
(2) AGREE TO SHARE THE TOTAL COST OF THE BENEFITS PROVIDED
TO A PARTICIPANT UNDER § 12–404 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) AGREE TO PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT AT NO COST
TO THE PARTICIPANT, INCLUDING MENTORSHIP, TRAINING, AND NETWORKING
OPPORTUNITIES.
(D) THE PROGRAM SHALL GIVE PRIORITY TO SUPERVISING
ORGANIZATIONS THAT:
(1) WORK IN UNDERSERVED AREAS OF THE STATE; OR
(2) SPECIALIZE IN UNDERSERVED LEGAL AREAS.
12–404.
(A) (1) A PARTICIPANT IN THE PROGRAM SHALL RECEIVE THE BENEFITS
AS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE STATE AND THE SUPERVISING ORGANIZATION EACH SHALL
PAY 50% OF THE TOTAL COST OF THE BENEFITS PROVIDED TO A PARTICIPANT
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(B) A PARTICIPANT SHALL RECEIVE:
(1) AN ANNUAL SALARY OF $75,000; AND
(2) AN ANNUAL HOUSING STIPEND OF $15,000.
(C) IF A PARTICIPANT HAS STUDENT LOAN DEBT FOR ATTENDING LAW
SCHOOL, THE PARTICIPANT SHALL RECEIVE UP TO $30,000 FOR EACH YEAR OF
PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM TO BE USED FOR PAYMENT OF THE STUDENT
LOAN DEBT.

HOUSE BILL 1544 5
12–405.
(A) WHEN A PARTICIPANT HAS SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED THE PROGRAM,
THE SUPERVISING ORGANIZATION SHALL ISSUE A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLETION TO
THE PARTICIPANT.
(B) AFTER A PARTICIPANT HAS RECEIVED A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLETION
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE PARTICIPANT MAY
COMPLETE THE MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS ESTABLISHED BY THE SUPREME COURT
OF MARYLAND FOR AN ALTERNATIVE PATHWAY TO LICENSURE.
(C) A PARTICIPANT WHO HAS RECEIVED A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLETION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND HAS SUCCESSFULLY
COMPLETED THE MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS ESTABLISHED BY THE SUPREME
COURT OF MARYLAND FOR AN ALTERNATIVE PATHWAY TO LICENSURE SHALL BE
ADMITTED TO THE BAR UNDER § 10–207 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND
PROFESSIONS ARTICLE.
12–406.
THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.